Indiana, session 2026, HB1018.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-17-12-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The division may
approve a grant from the fund to an applicant if the applicant
demonstrates to the division that the applicant is able to do the
following:
(1) Provide a physical environment that is safe and appropriate to
the various age levels of the children to be served.
(2) Provide transportation, if necessary, to and from a school or
schools to the facility operated by the applicant.
(3) (2) Provide program activities that are appropriate to the
various age levels of the children to be served and that meet the
developmental needs of each child.
(4) (3) Provide efficient and effective program administration.
(5) (4) Provide a staff that meets standards set by the division
under section 17 of this chapter.
(6) (5) Provide for nutritional needs of children enrolled in the
program.
(7) (6) Provide emergency health services to children served by
the program.
(8) (7) Operate a school age child care program in accordance
with the cost and expense standards set by the division under
section 17 of this chapter.
HEA 1018

2
SECTION 2. IC 12-17-12-17 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. The director of the
division shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary to carry out this
chapter, including rules specifying the following:
(1) Standards for the hiring of staff for a school age child care
program.
(2) Cost and expense standards for the following:
(A) Establishing and operating a school age child care
program within a school and within a facility other than a
school.
(B) Transporting a child to a facility where the child does
not attend school.
(3) A sliding fee scale for use by school age child care programs
that are operating under a grant from the fund.
(4) Minimum staff to child ratios for a school age child care
program.
(5) Physical space requirements for a school age child care
program, including indoor and outdoor space.
(6) Nutrition requirements for a school age child care program.
(7) Standards for the provision of emergency health services in a
school age child care program.
(8) Application guidelines and deadlines.
(9) A method for establishing priority of applicants.
HEA 1018

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1018